District of Columbia statutes.
42-3502.04c

Housing Regulation Administration; Housing Regulation Administrator.

(a)

There is established within the Department of Housing and Community Development, the Housing Regulation Administration, which shall have as its head a Housing Regulation Administrator. The Housing Regulation Administrator shall be appointed by, and report directly to, the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(b)

(1)

The Housing Regulation Administration shall provide such administrative support to the Rent Administrator and the Rental Conversion and Sale Administrator as may be necessary to fulfill their statutory and regulatory responsibilities.

(2)

The Housing Regulation Administrator shall work cooperatively with the Rent Administrator and the Rental Conversion and Sale Administrator to promote administrative efficiency, complete and accurate record-keeping, and the prompt review and disposition of matters pending before them.

(3)

The Housing Regulation Administrator shall not have a supervisory role over the Rent Administrator and the Rental Conversion and Sale Administrator.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 204c
as added Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-366, § 2(g), 56 DCR 1332

History